Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska80-327
Nebraska veterans homes; member; disability; guardianship proceedings; guardian or conservator; fees; bond.

Whenever a member of one of the Nebraska veterans homes becomes disabled because of age or otherwise to such an extent that it is impossible for the member to transact his or her personal financial business, the administrator of such home may institute, in the administrator's official capacity, proceedings for the legal appointment of a guardian or conservator to take charge of and administer all funds, whether pension, compensation, or otherwise, inuring to the member. A member of the staff of each home shall be named guardian officer of that home and may be appointed guardian or conservator of members of such home. The guardian officer shall not receive fees or compensation from the member for such services. Bond for the guardian officer shall be paid by the State of Nebraska.

Laws 1949, c. 272, § 3(2), p. 893;

Laws 1959, c. 420, § 3, p. 1416;

Laws 1971, LB 335, § 3;

Laws 1980, LB 184, § 4;

Laws 1995, LB 12, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1996), § 80-304.01;

Laws 1997, LB 396, § 16.